hytex/hyph_sme.dic
1vi2d
2v1i2d1j
vi1đ
1vi1đe1
1vi1đi2
1vie
vi1e1r
1v2i1g
1vi2h
1v2ii
vi1k2a1
v2ik
1vil
vi2ld1
vi2me
vi1m
vi2mo
1v2i2n
1v2i1o
1vir
1vis
vi2s2i
vi2sk
vi1so1
vi2s2t
1v2it
1v2iv
vi1va1
vi2vi
v1ja2
v1je
vj2e2h
v1ji
vjj2o2
v2j1j
v1j2o
v1ju
v1k2a1
vka2l
v1k2o
v1ko2b
vko2l
v1l2a2
v1l2á
v1l2e
v1le1s
v1l2i
vll2i2
v2l1l
vl2o2n
v1lo
v2lu
vn1ná2
v2n1n
vŋ1ŋá2
vŋ1ŋ
1vo
v2o1a
vo2b
v1o1đ
voju1
vo2l
vo2m
v1p
v1p2i2
vp2r
v1r
v1ra2s
v1r2e2
v2roi
vr2o
v1ro2l
vro2n
2vs
vses1
v1s2e
vs2k
v1s1k2á
v1s1k2e
v1sk2o
v1s1ku
v2s2t
v1s1ta
v1s1ti
v1š
2vt
vt1tá2
v2t1t
vt1t2e2
1vu
v2ud1
vu1ga1
vu2i1d
v2ui
vu1m
vu1r2o2
2v1v
vva2r
v1va
vvá2r
v1vá
v1vi2l
v1že
v1ži
1vø
1wa2
w1b
1we
w1g
w1k
w1l
w1m
w1v
x1a
xa2h
x2a2i1
xa2l
xa2me
xa1m
xa1mi1
xa2s
x1á
x1d
x1e
x1h
xha1
x1i1
xi2s1t
x1k
xk1l2a1
x1k2l2
x1o
x1p2
x1p2i1
xpo2r1
x1po
x1r
x1v
1y1a
y2ad
y2a2h
y2a2m
ya1s
yat2
y1á
y1b
y1be2
y1d2e
y2d1i
ydra1
y2d1r2
y1f
1yf2e
yfes1
y1g
y2h
y1i
y2id
yi1da2
yi2do2
1y2ii
y1k
yk1k2e1
y2k1k2
y2k2l2
y1l
y2lu1
y2me
ymna1
y2m1n
y1mo1
ym1po1
y2m1p
y1n
y2n1d2
yne1
y1n1e1r
y1nes1
y1ou
y1r
yra2h
y1ra2s
yr2o1
ys2at2
y1sa
ysk2
y1so1
y1to1
y1v
y2vi
yx1
yx1a2
1za
za2d
za2g
za2h
za2l
za2m
za2n
za2s
za2sk2
za2t2t
1zá2
2z1b
1ze
ze1b
2z1g
1zi2
2z1m
1zo
2z1oa
z1oi
zo2l
zo2m
zo2n
1zu2
2z1v
2z1z
zzes1
z1ze
ža2d
ža1d2u1
2ža1ge
ža1g
1žah
ž2a2i1
1žak
1ža2l
ža2m
ža2n
ža2š
1ža2t1g
1ža2t1m
2žaž
1žá2
žá2mu1
ž2ám
žá2s2
1že1b
1žed
1žes
1žeš
1žež
ž2h
1ži.
1ži2h
1ž2ik
ži2l
ži2s2
ž1k
ž1kon1
žk2o
2ž1m
1žo2
ž1oi
žo2s1m
1žu2
žuh2u1
ž2u2h
ž1v
2ž1ž
žža2
æ1f
æf2e2
æ1l
ä1d
ä1l
ä1n
ä1r
ø1d
2øi
ø1s
øsa1o1
ø1sa
ö1n
ö1n2i1
å1b
å1g
å2h
åi2
å1k
å2l
å2m
å2n
å1o
å1s2
å1v
åvi1
'1á
'1č
'1e
'1g
'1i
'1o
